en: Garland style: Balloon; Beaded; Burlap; Fabric; Feather; Felt; Floral; Foliage; Letters; Lighted; Paper; Pom pom; Ribbon; Shell; Star; Tassel; Tinsel; Wood bead; Other
fr: Style de guirlande: Montgolfière; Perlé; Burlap; Tissu; Plume; Feutre; Floral; Feuillage; Lettres; Lumineuse; Papier; Pompons; À ruban; Coquille; Étoile; Gland; Guirlande scintillante; Perles en bois; Autre
cs: Styl girlandy: Balónky; Korálky; Pytlovina; Tkanina; Peří; Plsť; Květiny; Listy; Nápis; Světla; Papír; Plstěné koule; Stuhy; Mušle; Hvězdy; Střapce; Pozlátko; Dřevěné korálky; Jiné
ko: 가랜드 스타일: 열기구; 구슬 장식; 삼베; 원단; 깃털; 펠트; 꽃; 식물형; 글자; 조명형; 종이; 폼폼; 리본; 껍데기; 별; 태슬; 틴셀; 나무 구슬; 기타
hr-HR: Stil girlanda: Balon; Perlice; Burlap; Tkanina; Pero; Filc; Cvjetni; Lišće; Slova; Osvijetljeno; Papir; Pompon; Vrpca; Školjka; Zvijezda; Kićanka; Sjajne trake; Drvena perla; Ostalo
nl: Slingerstijl: Ballon; Kralen; Jute; Stof; Veer; Vilt; Gebloemd; Bladslingers; Letters; Verlicht; Papier; Pompon; Lint; Schelp; Ster; Kwast; Klatergoud; Houten kraal; Overig
tr: Çelenk stili: Balonlu; Boncuk detaylı; Çuval bezi; Kumaş; Tüy; Keçe; Çiçekli; Yapraklı; Harfler; Işıklı; Kağıt; Ponpon; Şerit; Kabuk; Yıldız; Püskül; Simli; Ahşap boncuk; Diğer
it: Stile della ghirlanda: Pallone; Perline; Iuta; Tessuto; Piuma; Feltro; Floreale; Fogliame; Lettere; Illuminato; Carta; Pom pom; Nastro; Conchiglia; Stella; Fiocco; Lamé; Perlina di legno; Altro
sl-SI: Slog girlande: Balon; S perlami; Žaklovina; Tkanina; Pero; Filc; Cvetličen; Listje; Črke; Osvetljeno; Papir; Pom pom; Tračni; Shell; Zvezda; Resice; Bleščice; Lesena kroglica; Druga
da: Kransestil: Ballon; Beaded; Burlap; Stof; Fjer; Filt; Blomster; Blade; Bogstaver; Oplyst; Papir; Pom pom; Bånd; Skal; Stjerne; Kvast; Lametta; Træperle; Andet
ro-RO: Tipul ghirlandei: Balon; Cu mărgele; Pânză de sac; Material textil; Pană; Pâslă; Floral; Frunziș; Litere; Iluminată; Hârtie; Pompon; Fâșii; Scoici; Stele; Ciucuri; Beteală; Mărgele de lemn; Altele
sk-SK: Girlandový štýl: Balón; Korálky; Vrecovina; Tkanina; Perie; Plsť; Kvety; Z lístia; Listy; Osvetlená; Papier; Pom-pom; Stužka; Mušľa; Hviezda; Strapec; S pozlátkom; Z drevených korálikov; Iné
el: Τύπος γιρλάντας: Με μπαλόνια; Με χάντρες; Λινάτσας; Υφασμάτινη; Με φτερά; Τσόχας; Λουλουδιών; Φύλλωμα; Με γράμματα; Με φώτα; Χάρτινη; Πομ πομ; Με κορδέλα; Με κοχύλια; Με αστέρια; Με φούντες; Tinsel; Ξύλινες χάντρες; Άλλο
hu: Girland stílusa: Léggömb; Gyöngyös; Zsákvászon; Szövet; Toll; Filc; Virágos; Lombozat; Betűk; Világító; Papír; Pompon; Szalag; Kagyló; Csillag; Rojt; Csillogó; Fagyöngy; Egyéb
fi: Köynnöskoristeen tyyli: Ilmapallot; Helmet; Säkkikangas; Kangas; Höyhen; Huopa; Kukat; Lehvät; Kirjaimet; Valaistu; Paperi; Tupsu; Nauha; Kuori; Tähti; Tupsu; Paljetti; Puuhelmi; Muu
pt-BR: Estilo da guirlanda: Balão; De contas; Serapilheira; Tecido; Pena; Sentido; Floral; Folhagem; Letras; Iluminado; Papel; Pompom; Fita; Concha; Estrela; Borla; Festim; Conta de madeira; Outro
de: Girlandenstil: Ballon; Perlen; Juteleinen; Stoff; Feder; Filz; Blumenmuster; Laub; Briefe; Beleuchtet; Papier; Pompon; Schleife; Muschelschale; Stern; Quaste; Lametta; Holzperle; Sonstiges
pl: Typ girlandy: Balonowe; Koralikowe; Jutowe; Materiałowe; Piórkowe; Filcowe; Kwiatowe; Liściasta; Literowe; Z oświetleniem; Papierowe; Pompon; Wstążkowe; Muszla; Gwiazda; Frędzel; Lameta; Drewniane koraliki; Pozostałe
ru: Стиль гирлянды: Из воздушных шаров; Из бусин; Из мешковины; Тканевая; Перьевая; Фетровая; Цветочная; Листва; Из букв; Освещенный; Бумажная; Помпон; Из лент; Из ракушек; Со звездами; С кисточками; Мишура; Деревянная бусина; Другая
es: Estilo de guirnalda: Globo; Con cuentas; Arpillera; Tejido; Pluma; Fieltro; Floral; Follaje; Letras; Iluminado; Papel; Pompones; Cinta; Concha; Estrella; Borla; Espumillón; Cuentas de madera; Otros
sv: Girlangstil: Ballong; Med pärlor; Säckväv; Tyg; Fjäder; Filt; Blommig; Lövverk; Brev; Upplyst; Papper; polyoximetylen polyoximetylen; Band; Skal; Stjärna; Tofs; Glitter; Träpärla; Övrigt
pt-PT: Estilo da guirlanda: Balão; Com contas; Serapilheira; Tecido; Pena; Feltro; Floral; Folhagem; Letras; Iluminado; Papel; Pompons; Fita; Concha; Estrela; Borla; Lantejoulas; Contas de madeira; Outro
nb: Kransestil: Ballong; Perle; Jute; Stoff; Fjær; Filt; Blomster; Løvverk; Bokstaver; Opplyst; Papir; Pom pom; Bånd; Skjell; Stjerne; Dusk; Glitter; Treperle; Annet
lt-LT: Girliandos tipas: Balionas; Su karoliukais; Burlapas; Audinys; Plunksna; Veltinis; Gėlės; Lapai; Raidės; Apšviesta; Popierius; Pomponai; Juostinis; Kriauklė; Žvaigždė; Kutas; Blizgučiai; Mediniai karoliukai; Kita
bg-BG: Стил на гирлянда: Балон; С мъниста; Чул; Плат; Перо; Филц; Флорално; Листа; Букви; Осветено; Хартия; Помпон; Панделка; Раковина; Звезда; Пискюл; Лъскав гирлянд; Дървени мъниста; Друго
zh-TW: 花環風格: 氣球; 串珠; 粗麻布; 布料; 羽毛; 毛氈; 花卉; 葉子; 字母; 含燈; 紙製; 絨球; 絲帶; 貝殼; 星星; 流蘇; 金屬箔; 木珠; 其他
ja: ガーランドのスタイル: 風船; ビーズ; バーラップ; 布地; 羽毛; フェルト; フローラル; 葉; 文字; ライト付き; 紙; ポンポン; リボン; シェル; 星; タッセル; ティンセル; 木製ビーズ; その他
vi: Kiểu dây hoa trang trí: Bóng bay; Đính cườm; Vải bố; Vải; Lông vũ; Nỉ; Hoa cỏ; Cành lá trang trí; Chữ cái; Có đèn chiếu sáng; Giấy; Quả cầu bông trang trí; Ruy-băng; Vỏ; Ngôi sao; Núm tua; Dây kim tuyến; Hạt gỗ; Khác
th: สไตล์ของพวงมาลัย: บอลลูน; ประดับลูกปัด; ผ้าป่าน; ผ้า; ขนนก; ผ้าสักหลาด; ลายดอก; สไตล์ใบไม้; จดหมาย; แบบติดไฟประดับ; กระดาษ; สไตล์ปอมปอม; ริบบิ้น; เปลือก; ดาว; พู่; แบบฟอยล์แวววาว; สไตล์ร้อยลูกปัดไม้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 花环样式: 气球; 串珠; 麻布; 布艺; 羽毛; 毛毡; 花卉; 枝叶; 字母; 带灯; 纸质; 毛球; 丝带; 贝壳; 星型; 流苏; 金属丝; 木珠; 其他